Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4222.01
Insurer, agent, broker, or third-party
administrator; prohibited acts; violation; unfair trade practice.

(1) No insurer, agent,
broker, or third-party administrator shall refer an individual employee to
the pool or arrange for an individual employee to apply for pool coverage
for the purpose of separating that individual employee from group health insurance
coverage in connection with the individual employee's employment.

(2) Any violation of
this section shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance
subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 2009, LB358, § 6.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.